Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 11. Gulf Regional District Law

§ 17-11-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be referred to as the “Gulf Regional District Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-71; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meaning ascribed to them hereby, except where the context clearly describes and indicates a different meaning:

Person: Any individual, firm, co-partnership, joint venture, association, corporation estate, trust, or any other group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular number unless the intention to give a more limited meaning is disclosed by the context.

District: The Gulf Regional District, as an agency and instrumentality of the State of Mississippi.

Public agency: Any county, municipal corporation, school district, utility district, port authority, port development commission, port commission, housing commission or authority, agency of any county, municipal corporation, or of the state, or any combination thereof.

City: An existing municipal corporation of the State of Mississippi; or one hereinafter incorporated.

Region: The geographical area of such of the counties bordering on the Gulf of Mexico or contiguous to any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico as shall have elected to come within the provisions of this chapter and join the district under the provisions hereof.

Regional: The entire area within the region or such contiguous area thereof as may be designated by the governing body of the district.

Project: Any undertaking, purpose, service, or program, governmental or corporate, authorized to be performed by any public agency, under the laws of the State of Mississippi, including but not limited to the acquisition, leasing or purchasing of property, real, personal or mixed, and the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation or improvement thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-51; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-5.
Declaration of purpose.

The Gulf Regional District is hereby created as an agency and instrumentality of the State of Mississippi for the purpose of encouraging the voluntary association of local communities and political entities of the state within the region, and for the purpose of acting as a unified coordinating unit structured to solve common areawide problems by mutual cooperation within the framework of local governmental control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-52; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-7.
Composition of governing body of district; terms of office.

The governing body of the district shall consist of:

The presidents of the boards of supervisors of each county and the mayors of each city within the region electing to associate as a member of the district, each to serve a term concurrent with their respective elective terms of office. In event of the inability of the president of the board of supervisors or a mayor of a city to attend any meeting, he may designate in writing any other member of the board of supervisors or the governing body of such city to attend such meeting, and to vote for and on behalf of such county or city.

Three members to be appointed by the Governor from qualified electors within the region. The initial appointment of one member shall be for a period of one year, one member for a period of two years, and the third member for a period of three years. Thereafter, all such appointments shall be for a period of four years. Each appointment shall be made from a list of at least three qualified persons submitted to the Governor by the elected official members of the governing body at least thirty days prior to the vacancy.

Four members from the qualified electors in the region to be appointed by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the governing body of the district. However, at no time shall the number of appointive members of the district as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section be greater than the number of cities and counties then associated with the district. The initial appointment of one member shall be for a period of one year, one member for a period of two years, one member for a period of three years and one member for a period of four years. Thereafter, all such appointments shall be for a period of four years.

The governing body of the district may, in its discretion, designate and appoint ex-officio and nonvoting members to the governing body of the district from such public agencies within the region as the governing body of the district may deem desirable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-53; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-9.
Oath of office.

All voting members of the governing body of the district shall be qualified electors within the region, and, except as to those members who already hold public office under the laws of this state, shall take the oath of office required under Section 268 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-54; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-11.
Association by county or city with the district.

In the event any county or city within the region desires to become a member of the district, such county or city shall so indicate by proper resolution of its governing body declaring this intention. Such resolution shall contain notice that an election will be held to permit the qualified electors of such county or city to decide if they desire to become associated with the district. Such election shall be held and conducted by the election commissioners of the county or city in accordance with the general laws governing elections, and only qualified electors as reside within the county or city shall be entitled to vote in such election. Such resolution shall set forth the time, place or places, and purpose of such election, which shall be published by the clerk of the governing body of such county or city for the time and in the manner required by law. The ballots to be prepared and used at said election shall be in substantially the following form:

FOR associating with the Gulf Regional District ( )

AGAINST association with the Gulf Regional District ( )

Voters shall vote by placing a cross mark (x) or a check mark (Π) opposite their choice.

If a majority of those voting in such election favor associating with the said district, then in such event the resolution of the county or city shall become operative and that county or city shall become a member of the district.

A resolution of the governing body of all such cities and counties as provided herein indicating its intention to or not to become a member of the district shall be adopted on or before February 1, 1972.

If, in the event the governing authorities adopt a resolution indicating its intention not to become a member of the district, within thirty days from the adoption of said resolution ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors of such county or city or fifteen hundred (1,500) qualified electors of such county or city, whichever shall be the lesser number, shall file written petitions with the governing authorities of such county or city before the date specified as aforesaid in favor of becoming associated as a member of the district, then the governing bodies of such county or city shall call an election on the question of whether or not such county or city shall become associated as a member of such district. Such election shall be held and conducted by the election commissioners of the county or city as nearly as may be in accordance with the general laws governing elections as hereinbefore provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-55; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-13.
Withdrawal by county or city from the district.

In the event any county or city within the region desires to withdraw from the district, having previously voted to become associated with such district as provided in Section 17-11-11, and at least six months has elapsed since the date the election was held for becoming associated with the district as provided in said section, such county or city shall follow the same procedure for withdrawing from the district as that followed for becoming associated with the district. Withdrawal from said district may also be initiated by petition in the same manner as provided in said section for the election for associating with said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-56; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-15.
Interim organization of district.

Prior to July 20, 1971, the Governor shall appoint the members of the governing body of the district required to be appointed by him under this chapter. Until at least three counties and/or cities within the region have elected to become associated as members of the district as provided in this chapter, the members of the governing body of the district shall constitute an interim body, and their powers and duties shall be limited to the following:

To make a determination of all factors that relate to the long-range development of the affected area and to correlate such factors to the economy and development of the entire state.

To explore all available avenues of assistance, both public and private, and to bring into focus the aims, aspirations, and needs of our people.

To make specific recommendations of the most efficient and effective roles that should be played by local and state governments in cooperation with the federal government and private interests, to the end that the total resources of all might be mobilized swiftly and decisively to accomplish this objective.

To recommend a comprehensive plan for the accomplishments of the maximum long-range development of the area’s recreational, cultural and economic life.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-57; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-17.
Official organization of district.

When at least three cities and/or counties within the region have elected to become associated as members of the district in the manner provided in this chapter, and the attorney general has reviewed the official proceedings of the governing bodies of such counties and/or cities and has certified to the Governor that such counties and/or cities have elected to become associated as members of the district in the manner required by this chapter, then the Governor within fifteen days after such certification shall issue a proclamation declaring that such district has been lawfully organized with the powers as set forth in Section 17-11-15, and that it is vested with all the additional powers, rights, and duties conferred on it by this chapter. The Governor shall, in such proclamation, fix a date, time and place, within the region, for the formal organization of the governing body of such district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-58; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-19.
Budget; administrative support of district.

Upon the Governor issuing such proclamation as is provided for in Section 17-11-17, the governing body of the district, as constituted in this chapter, shall meet and adopt an annual budget for the operation, maintenance and support of the district. The funds for the administrative support of the district shall be apportioned equally on an annual basis of not more than Fifty Cents (50¢) per capita of the population of each associated member of the district, according to the last official federal census. If a city associated with the district is within a county which is also associated with the district, the city and county shall each pay not more than Twenty-five Cents (25¢) for the residents of such city. Such amount may be paid by each associated member from its general or surplus funds on or before April 1st of each calendar year. The governing body of the district may from time to time revise or amend the budget of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-59; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 9; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 3, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 17-11-21.
General powers of district.

The district shall be authorized and empowered as follows:

To adopt rules or procedures for the regulation of its affairs, to set forth policies and procedures for the conduct of its business, including the number of members sufficient to constitute a quorum, and to appoint, from among its members, a chairman, vice-chairman, and secretary to serve annually; such chairman may be subject to re-election.

To fix the compensation of the members of the governing body of the district, other than elective officers who may be members of such governing body, for their attendance at meetings of such governing body, such compensation not to exceed Twenty-two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($22.50) per meeting, and to allow such members their necessary travel expenses within the limits fixed by law for state employees.

To adopt a seal, and to retain and keep minutes of its meetings in a firmly bound minute book, in which all actions taken by the commission about its business shall be recorded.

To maintain offices at such place or places as it may designate, and meet at regular times at least two times each year. On written request of any two voting members of the district, requesting a special meeting of the governing body of the district, addressed to the office of the executive director, and delivered by first class mail, the executive director shall notify all members by first class mail of the convening of a special meeting of the members at a time not more than ten days from the receipt of such notice, at a place most convenient for such meeting within the district, and for the consideration of the matter giving rise to the convening of such meeting. The members shall only consider the matters touching the convening of such special meeting, and may recess from day to day, or place to place.

To employ and to compensate an executive director who may serve as secretary, and such other personnel, consultants, and technical and professional assistants as shall be necessary to exercise the powers and perform the duties set forth in this chapter.

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter. The executive director shall be the duly authorized individual to execute contracts on behalf of said district, upon duly and properly entered resolution of said district so authorizing him to enter and execute said contract.

To hold public hearings and sponsor public forums in any part of the region whenever the district deems it necessary or useful in the execution of its functions.

To accept and receive, in the furtherance of its functions, funds, grants and service from the federal government or its agencies, from departments, agencies and instrumentalities of state, municipal or local governments and from private or civil sources.

To receive and expend such sums of money as shall be from time to time appropriated for its use by any county, state or public agency, or other public or private bodies, corporations or persons, and to receive and expend federal funds.

The broad general powers granted the Gulf Regional District in this chapter shall not in any way conflict with the objectives and services of the Southern Mississippi Economic Development District, Inc., or any other public agency.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-60; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-23.
Duties and responsibilities of district.

The district shall have the responsibility and is granted wide latitude and broad authority to:

Coordinate all activities, in planning for the redevelopment of the region;

Provide a mechanism for the solution of areawide problems;

Develop more effective lines of communication by and between local, regional, state and federal governments and agencies;

Detail the program for the long-term development of the region;

Develop and continually update comprehensive regional and associated regional plans for the district;

Provide for the marshalling of the region’s natural and human resources;

Provide additional planning assistance to any public agency;

Undertake and provide for the financing of any regional project for and on behalf of any public agency, which any such public agency may be empowered to undertake in its or their right by law;

Enter into contracts with any public agency or any federal agency or private persons for the performance of any project within the region.

The powers, duties and responsibilities set out in subsection (1)(a) through (i) of this section shall be subject to the express limitation that no such rights, powers or duties shall be undertaken or exercised by the district except at the request of and with the consent of the public agency involved in any approved project.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-61; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-25.
Implementation of regional projects.

The district is authorized and empowered to consider, plan, propose, and at the request of and with the consent of the public agency involved in such project, to provide for the implementation of any approved regional project. The district may determine and establish priorities for the consideration of regional projects, and shall give primary attention to those projects related to rehabilitating those areas of the region devastated by disaster, to safeguard the lives and promote the safety of the people within the region, and for the protection of property from future disaster.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-62; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-27.
Feasibility studies.

Any public agency may request the district to approve a regional plan for any project and for such purpose is hereby authorized to appoint competent consultants, engineers and/or other technical personnel, to be approved by the district, to prepare an analysis and feasibility study of such proposed project, which analysis shall include the plan of operation, the financing to be provided by each public agency and the source of all anticipated revenue, estimated expenditures, the estimated cost of construction, where required, the estimated cost of lands, properties, facilities, machinery, rights, easements and franchises to be acquired, if any, the estimated cost of engineering, architectural and legal expenses and all financing charges and interest, and such other estimated receipts and expenditures as may be necessary or incidental to such project, together with a projection of the gross and net revenues anticipated from the net operation of such project, and any proposed option, contracts or commitments involved in such project, and such other information as may be required by the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-63; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-29.
Approval of projects.

On the receipt of an application from any public agency for the authorization of a regional project the district may cause an independent evaluation to be made of the plan submitted and if the district shall find and determine that the project is feasible and is in the public interest, then the district in its discretion may approve such plan as submitted or may approve such plan, subject to such changes and modifications as may be required by the district, or may disapprove such plan in its entirety, all in the discretion of the district. All costs of any consultants, technical or other personnel employed by the district in making an evaluation of such proposed project shall be borne by the public agency submitting the project, but the cost thereof shall be fixed by agreement between the district and such public agency prior to the district undertaking such evaluation. Any such project may, at the request of a public agency, be undertaken by the district for and on behalf of such public agency, subject to such terms, conditions and agreements as may be made by and between the district and such public agency, which agreements shall be binding on all parties thereto, and shall be enforceable in the chancery court as provided in Section 17-11-55. No such project shall be approved without the consent of the governing authorities of each city or county participating in such project and the consent of the governing authorities of each city or county within whose boundaries such project is to apply.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-64; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-31.
Planning functions.

In its planning functions, the district may, in its discretion, use the gulf regional planning commission as the planning instrumentality of the district. Each county and city within the district, including those counties or cities not associated as members of the district, shall make available to the district their current zoning ordinances, building codes, housing codes, subdivision regulations and all other codes which such cities or municipalities are authorized to adopt, and shall furnish the district from time to time with copies of all revisions, amendments or supplements to such ordinances, regulations or codes. The district is authorized to propose, but shall not have the power to compel, the adoption of uniform ordinances, regulations and codes pertaining to such matters, and may serve as a clearing house for the dissemination of information relating to planning matters between the counties, cities and other municipalities within the region.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-65; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-33.
Acquisition of property.

To carry out the powers and authority conferred by this chapter, the district is authorized either directly, or through the public agency involved in an approved project, to acquire land, and interests in land, property, and interest in property, including but not limited to rights, easements, licenses, franchises, and privileges therein necessary or required to carry out such approved project. The right to exercise the power of eminent domain shall be exercised only by the governing bodies of the political subdivisions within whose boundaries such approved project is to apply, as provided for by Chapter 27 of Title 11 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be subject to the same limitations as are now or may hereafter be imposed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-66; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-35.
Expenditure of public funds, issuance of bonds, and mortgaging of property authorized.

The district, and each county and city within the region associated as a member of the district, are hereby granted the power and authority to expend public funds of the district or such county or city for the purposes authorized by this chapter, and are authorized to issue revenue bonds, notes, or other revenue obligations to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and are authorized to mortgage or pledge property, real, personal or mixed, and to secure such obligations in a manner to be provided for by resolution of such district or such county or such city. The governing bodies of the district and each county or city within the region associated as a member of the district, acting separately or jointly, may, in its or their discretion, issue revenue bonds of the district, or of the county, or of the city, or jointly, to provide funds to finance any regional project approved by the district, in the manner provided in this chapter. Each county or city within the region, associated as a member of the district, may, in its discretion, issue general obligation bonds of such county or city, in an amount not to exceed its legal limit, to provide funds to finance any regional project approved by the district for any purpose which such county or city is now authorized, or hereafter may be authorized by law, to issue general obligation bonds of such county or such city. No authority, either direct or implied, is extended by this chapter to the district to issue general obligation bonds of the district as a whole, or of any participating agency or entity within the region, as described in this chapter.

In addition to the method of issuing bonds provided in this chapter, any county or city may, if authorized by law, issue bonds under any other general or special law to secure funds for the purposes of funding such project.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-37.
Resolution declaring intention to issue bonds; election.

The governing body of the district, county or city shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to issue bonds for the purposes authorized by this chapter, stating the amount of the bonds proposed to be issued, whether such bonds are revenue bonds or general obligation bonds, and the date upon which further action will be taken by the governing body looking forward to the issuance of such bonds. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three successive weeks in a newspaper published and of general circulation within such county or city. The first of such publications shall be made at least twenty-one days prior to the date set forth in said resolution as the date upon which further action will be taken by the governing body, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven days prior to said date. If, prior to the date set forth as aforesaid, there shall be filed with the clerk of such governing body a petition in writing signed by ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors of such regional area, county or city thereof, or fifteen hundred (1,500) qualified electors, whichever shall be the lesser number, requesting an election on the question of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued unless authorized by a majority of the qualified electors in such regional area, county or city voting thereon at an election to be ordered by the governing body for that purpose. Notice of such election shall be given and such election shall be held and conducted in like manner as provided by law with respect to elections held on the submission of county or city bond issues. If the proposition so submitted shall fail to receive approval at such election, then no further proceedings for the issuance of such bonds shall be taken for a period of six months from and after the date of such election. If, however, no such petition shall be filed, or if such election or subsequent election on such proposition shall be assented to by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon, then such governing body shall be authorized to proceed with the issuance of such bonds without further election.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-39.
Details of revenue bonds.

Revenue bonds shall bear date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, mature at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, bear such registration privileges and be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the governing body or bodies issuing such bonds. No bond shall bear more than one rate of interest. Each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid. All bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. Such bonds shall be sold in such manner and upon such terms as the governing body or bodies shall determine. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than eight percent (8%) per annum, and the interest rate of any one maturity shall not exceed eight percent (8%) per annum. Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%).

Such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than five years from the date thereof and extending not more than thirty-five years from the date thereof.

The revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be payable solely out of the revenues to accrue from the operation of the approved regional project, and the full faith and credit of the district, county or city shall not be pledged therefor, nor shall any ad valorem tax be levied therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-41.
Details of general obligation bonds.

General obligation bonds issued by any associated member county or city under this chapter shall bear date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding the rate authorized to be paid on general obligation bonds of the state, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, mature at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, bear such registration privileges and be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the governing body or bodies issuing such bonds.

The general obligation bonds authorized by this chapter shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than the rate authorized to be paid on general obligation bonds of the county or city issuing same. No bond shall bear more than one rate of interest. Each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid. All bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. Such bonds shall be sold in such manner and upon such terms as the governing body or bodies shall determine. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than eight percent (8%) per annum, and the interest rate of any one maturity shall not exceed eight percent (8%) per annum. Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named.

Such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than five years from the date thereof and extending not more than thirty-five years from the date thereof.

Such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than five years from the date thereof and extending not more than twenty-five years from the date thereof. Such bonds shall be general obligations of such county or such city and for the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon the full faith, credit and resources of such county or such city shall be irrevocably pledged. It shall be the mandatory duty of the governing body of such county or such city to annually levy on all taxable property within such county or such city an ad valorem tax sufficient to pay for such bonds as they mature, and the interest thereon as the same becomes due. The proceeds of such tax levy shall be used for no other purpose. In its discretion, the governing body of such county or city may also pledge for the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon the revenues from any approved regional project.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-43.
Execution of bonds.

All bonds issued under this chapter shall be signed by the presiding officer of the governing body or bodies issuing the same, and the official seal or seals of such governing body or bodies shall be affixed thereto, attested by the clerk or secretary of such governing body or bodies. The interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of said officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officers herein designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-45.
Sale of bonds.

The governing body or bodies issuing bonds under this chapter shall sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it or they may determine to be for the best interest of said governing body or bodies. No such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds of the purchaser. Notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time not less than ten days prior to the date of sale, and shall be published in a newspaper published in and having general circulation within such regional area, county or city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-47.
Disposition of proceeds; additional bonds.

The proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter shall be paid into a special fund or funds in banks qualified to act as depositories in such regional area, county or city, and may be deposited, invested, and disbursed as set out in the agreements relating to such approved project. The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the purposes for which they were issued, interim investments, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, and shall be disbursed upon order of the governing body or bodies with such restriction, if any, as the resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide.

If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the purpose for which they were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of such bonds, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same funds without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. However, such additional bonds issued shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the amount of the original issue.

If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-49.
Interim certificates authorized.

In anticipation of the issuance of the definitive bonds authorized by this chapter, any such county or city may issue interim certificates. Such interim certificates shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions or provisions, bear such date or dates, and evidence such agreement or agreements, relating to their discharge by payment or by the delivery of the definitive bonds, as such county or city by resolution of its governing body may determine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-51.
Validation of bonds; hearing of objections to issuance and sale; negotiability.

All bonds issued under the authority of this chapter shall be validated in the chancery court of any county involved in an approved project, or in which a city involved in an approved project is located, and in the case of two or more cities located in different counties, then in either county, with all public agencies involved in such approved project being parties to the validation proceedings, with the full right to any party in interest to file objections thereto, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now by Chapter 13 of Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal school district and other bonds.

All objections to any matters relating to the issuance and sale of such bonds shall be adjudicated and determined by the chancery court in the validation proceedings and in no other manner, and all rights of the parties shall be preserved and not foreclosed, for the hearing before the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this chapter and all notes or other obligations authorized herein, shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds and income therefrom and all notes or other obligations authorized herein shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi.

All such bonds, notes or other obligations authorized herein, may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).

§ 17-11-53.
District is a state agency and instrumentality.

The district is an agency and instrumentality of the state and shall be and remain an agency of the state at all times while acting at the request of and for and on behalf of any public agency in the performance of a governmental function, and shall have the same immunity from all actions as does the public agency for which it is acting, except as hereinbefore and hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9054-67; Laws, 1971, ch. 517, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1971).